Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.162

Unlicensed practice—Uniform Disciplinary Act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice of persons required to obtain a license under this chapter.

[ 2024 c 121 s 35.]